Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4161.
People of the State of Michigan enact: PART 1 LINE-ITEM APPROPRIATIONS FOR OCTOBER 1, 2025 to OCTOBER 8, 2025 Sec. 1. (1) To eliminate any possible disturbance of normal state fiscal operations that will occur if the 2025-2026 appropriations bills are not enacted into law by October 1, 2025 and to provide for the uninterrupted continuous operations of state government, there is appropriated for the various state departments and agencies, the legislative branch, the judicial branch, and certain other purposes, for the period from October 1, 2025 to October 8, 2025, the amounts authorized in this act. (2) The expenditure of the interim appropriations authorized under this act are predicated on activities, programs, or projects for which appropriations were authorized for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY Full-time equated unclassified positions 188.5 Full-time equated classified positions 55,411.9 Full-time equated exempted positions 643.5 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,568,557,600 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 26,630,900 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,541,926,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 657,487,500 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 6,194,100 Total private revenues 4,658,400 Total other state restricted revenues 601,236,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 272,349,900 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE AND RURAL DEVELOPMENT Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 550.0 Operations, grants, and services $ 3,082,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,082,100 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 7,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 424,100 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 500 Total other state restricted revenues 982,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,667,700 Sec. 103. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 621.4 Operations, grants, and services $ 2,664,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,664,500 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 804,500 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 216,500 Special revenue funds: Total other state restricted revenues 468,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,175,100 Sec. 104. DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL RIGHTS Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 169.0 Operations, grants, and services $ 607,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 607,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 60,300 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 400 Total other state restricted revenues 1,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 545,700 Sec. 105. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS Full-time equated unclassified positions 16.0 Full-time equated classified positions 13,135.2 Operations, grants, and services $ 44,365,900 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 44,365,900 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 108,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 5,800 Total other state restricted revenues 627,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 43,625,100 Sec. 106. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 568.5 Operations, grants, and services $ 3,395,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,395,300 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 1,719,800 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 122,300 Total private revenues 53,000 Total other state restricted revenues 210,800 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,289,400 Sec. 107. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 1,646.0 Operations, grants, and services $ 19,377,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 19,377,100 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 85,100 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 9,662,300 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 28,500 Total other state restricted revenues 6,440,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 3,160,600 Sec. 108. EXECUTIVE OFFICE Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0 Full-time equated classified positions 86.2 Operations, grants, and services $ 194,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 194,600 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 194,600 Sec. 109. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 15,935.5 Operations, grants, and services $ 780,220,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 780,220,400 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 306,400 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 554,767,200 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 3,552,000 Total private revenues 3,700,000 Total other state restricted revenues 81,188,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 136,706,800 Sec. 110. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 398.5 Operations, grants, and services $ 1,627,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,627,600 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 15,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 14,600 Special revenue funds: Total other state restricted revenues 1,597,300 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 111. JUDICIARY Full-time equated exempted positions 643.5 Operations, grants, and services $ 7,728,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 7,728,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 39,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 148,600 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 39,700 Total other state restricted revenues 1,997,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,502,300 Sec. 112. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY Full-time equated unclassified positions 34.5 Full-time equated classified positions 2,637.0 Operations, grants, and services $ 36,897,600 Community college skilled trades equipment program 4,600,000 Facility for rare isotope beams 7,300,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 48,797,600 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 24,524,300 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 222,900 Total private revenues 262,200 Total other state restricted revenues 11,778,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 12,009,600 Sec. 113. LEGISLATURE Senate $ 1,052,900 Senate automated data processing 66,500 Senate fiscal agency 98,700 House of representatives 1,546,300 House automated data processing 66,500 House fiscal agency 98,700 Legislative corrections ombudsman 33,100 Legislative council 343,200 Legislative service bureau automated data processing 77,400 Michigan veterans facility ombudsman 7,700 National association dues 703,700 Tribal legislative liaison 10,500 Worker's compensation 3,700 General nonretirement expenses 130,800 Binsfield Office Building and other properties 205,600 Cora Anderson Building 142,200 Office of the auditor general 650,800 General operations 137,000 Restoration, renewal, and maintenance 82,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,457,900 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 152,800 Federal revenues: Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 9,800 Total other state restricted revenues 164,600 State general fund/general purpose $ 5,130,700 Sec. 114. DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS Full-time equated unclassified positions 30.0 Full-time equated classified positions 1,791.0 Operations, grants, and services $ 13,218,500 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 13,218,500 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 576,800 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 634,800 Special revenue funds: Total other state restricted revenues 5,827,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 6,179,200 Sec. 115. DEPARTMENT OF LIFELONG EDUCATION, ADVANCEMENT, AND POTENTIAL Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 337.0 Operations, grants, and services $ 12,687,400 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 12,687,400 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 10,529,000 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 5,200 Total other state restricted revenues 38,900 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,114,300 Sec. 116. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS Full-time equated unclassified positions 9.0 Full-time equated classified positions 1,051.0 Operations, grants, and services $ 5,352,200 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 5,352,200 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 2,100 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 3,016,400 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 2,100 Total other state restricted revenues 275,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 2,056,100 Sec. 117. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 2,539.3 Operations, grants, and services $ 10,949,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 10,949,600 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 4,300 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 2,003,000 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 158,600 Total other state restricted revenues 7,372,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 1,411,500 Sec. 118. DEPARTMENT OF STATE Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 1,629.0 Operations, grants, and services $ 6,080,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 6,080,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 416,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 30,500 Special revenue funds: Total private revenues 1,100 Total other state restricted revenues 5,382,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 249,200 Sec. 119. DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE Full-time equated unclassified positions 7.0 Full-time equated classified positions 3,849.0 Operations, grants, and services $ 19,337,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 19,337,700 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 566,500 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 2,063,800 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 103,700 Total private revenues 800 Total other state restricted revenues 3,645,500 State general fund/general purpose $ 12,957,400 Sec. 120. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 3,243.5 Operations, grants, and services $ 31,755,300 State building authority rent 20,514,300 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 52,269,600 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 23,330,200 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 91,600 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 48,700 Total private revenues 4,000 Total other state restricted revenues 2,710,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 26,084,700 Sec. 121. STATE DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION Full-time equated unclassified positions 6.0 Full-time equated classified positions 3,222.3 Operations, grants, and services $ 130,275,200 Debt service 340,703,700 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 470,978,900 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 90,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 46,951,600 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 1,821,900 Total private revenues 391,700 Total other state restricted revenues 421,723,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 122. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY Full-time equated unclassified positions 10.0 Full-time equated classified positions 2,002.5 Operations, grants, and services $ 16,814,200 Debt service 7,924,000 City, village, and township revenue sharing 6,948,900 Constitutional state general revenue sharing grants 22,361,100 County revenue sharing 6,064,800 Financially distressed cities, villages, or townships 52,100 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 60,165,100 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 233,100 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 521,100 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 316,800 Total private revenues 800 Total other state restricted revenues 48,803,400 State general fund/general purpose $ 10,289,900 PART 2 PROVISIONS CONCERNING APPROPRIATIONS FOR OCTOBER 1, 2025 to OCTOBER 8, 2025 GENERAL SECTIONS Sec. 201. (1) On enactment of the respective full fiscal year appropriation acts for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2026, authority for interim appropriations authorized by this act for a department, branch, or other purpose terminates. (2) If subsection (1) applies, all obligations incurred, and expenditures made, under this act become the obligations and expenditures authorized under the appropriate line items in the respective full fiscal year appropriation act. Sec. 202. On enactment of the appropriations in this act, the state budget director shall authorize allotments of the appropriations in this act for each department and agency. These allotments must be based on the continuation of activities, programs, or projects for which appropriations were authorized for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2025. DEPARTMENT OF ATTORNEY GENERAL Sec. 301. (1) The attorney general shall perform all legal services, including representation before courts and administrative agencies, rendering legal opinions, and providing legal advice to a principal executive department or state agency. A principal executive department or state agency shall not employ or enter into a contract with any other person for services described in this section. (2) The attorney general shall defend judges of all state courts if a claim is made or a civil action is commenced for injuries to persons or property caused by the judge through the performance of the judge's duties while acting within the scope of the judge's authority as a judge. (3) The attorney general shall perform the duties specified in 1846 RS 12, MCL 14.28 to 14.35, and 1919 PA 232, MCL 14.101 to 14.102, and as otherwise provided by law. Sec. 302. The department of attorney general is responsible for the legal representation of the law of this state and the legal representation for state of Michigan state employee worker's disability compensation cases. Risk management revolving fund revenue must be satisfied by billings from the department of attorney general for actual costs of legal representation, including salaries and support costs. Sec. 303. The department of attorney general shall not receive or expend funds, other than those authorized in part 1, for legal services provided specifically to other state departments or agencies except for expert witness costs, court costs, or other nonsalary litigation costs associated with pending legal action. DEPARTMENT OF CIVIL RIGHTS Sec. 326. In addition to the appropriation contained in part 1, the department of civil rights may receive and expend not more than $50,000.00 in funds from local sources, private sources, or both, for all of the following purposes: (a) Developing and presenting training for employers on equal employment opportunity law and procedures. (b) Publishing and selling civil rights related informational material. (c) Providing copies of material made available in response to requests under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (d) Paying other copy fees, subpoena fees, and witness fees. (e) Developing, presenting, and participating in mediation processes for certain civil rights cases. (f) Providing workshops, seminars, and recognition or award programs consistent with the programmatic mission of the individual unit sponsoring or coordinating the programs. (g) Paying staffing costs for all activities included in this section. Sec. 327. The department of civil rights may contract with local units of government to review equal employment opportunity compliance of potential and existing contractors and may charge for and expend amounts received from local units of government for the purpose of developing and providing these contractual services. Sec. 328. If the department of civil rights submits a report or complaint to the United States Commission on Civil Rights or to any other federal department, the department of civil rights shall submit a copy of the same report or complaint to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on general government, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office not later than the next business day. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS Sec. 351. The department of corrections may charge fees and collect revenues in excess of appropriations in part 1 not to exceed the cost of offender services and programming, employee meals, parolee loans, academic/vocational services, custody escorts, compassionate visits, union steward activities, public work programs, and services provided to units of government or private nonprofit organizations. The revenues and fees collected are appropriated for all expenses associated with these services and activities. Sec. 352. (1) The department of corrections shall administer a county jail reimbursement program from the funds appropriated in part 1 for the purpose of reimbursing counties for housing in jails felons who otherwise would have been sentenced to prison. (2) The county jail reimbursement program must be used to reimburse counties for convicted felons in the custody of the sheriff if the conviction was for a crime committed on or after January 1, 1999 and 1 of the following applies: (a) The felon's sentencing guidelines recommended range upper limit is more than 18 months, the felon's sentencing guidelines recommended range lower limit is 12 months or less, the felon's prior record variable score is 35 or more points, and the felon's sentence is not for commission of a crime in crime class G or crime class H or a nonperson crime in crime class F under chapter XVII of the code of criminal procedure, 1927 PA 175, MCL 777.1 to 777.69. (b) The felon's minimum sentencing guidelines range minimum is more than 12 months under the sentencing guidelines described in subdivision (a). (c) The felon was sentenced to jail for a felony committed while the felon was on parole and under the jurisdiction of the parole board and for which the sentencing guidelines recommended range for the minimum sentence has an upper limit of more than 18 months. (3) State reimbursement under this section must be $70.00 per diem per diverted offender for offenders with a presumptive prison guideline score, $60.00 per diem per diverted offender for offenders with a straddle cell guideline for a group 1 crime, and $45.00 per diem per diverted offender for offenders with a straddle cell guideline for a group 2 crime. Reimbursements must be paid for sentences up to a 1-year total. (4) County jail reimbursement program expenditures must not exceed the amount appropriated. Payments to counties under the county jail reimbursement program must be made in the order in which properly documented requests for reimbursements are received. A request is properly documented if it meets departmental requirements for documentation. Not later than October 15, the department of corrections shall distribute the documentation requirements to all counties. (5) As used in this section: (a) "Group 1 crime" means a crime in 1 or more of the following offense categories: arson, assault, assaultive other, burglary, criminal sexual conduct, homicide or resulting in death, other sex offenses, robbery, and weapon possession as determined by the department based on specific crimes for which counties received reimbursement under the county jail reimbursement program in fiscal year 2007 and fiscal year 2008, and listed in the county jail reimbursement program document titled "FY 2007 and FY 2008 Group One Crimes Reimbursed", dated March 31, 2009. (b) "Group 2 crime" means a crime that is not a group 1 crime, including larceny, fraud, forgery, embezzlement, motor vehicle offenses, malicious destruction of property, controlled substance offense, felony drunk driving, and other nonassaultive offenses. (c) "In the custody of the sheriff" means that the convicted felon has been sentenced to the county jail and either is housed in a county jail, is in custody but is being housed at a hospital or medical facility for a medical or mental health purpose, or has been released from jail and is being monitored through the use of the sheriff's electronic monitoring system. Sec. 353. The department of corrections may accept cash or in-kind donations to supplement funds for prison education training, supplies, and materials necessary to complete the academic and jobs skills related programs. All funds received are appropriated and may be expended by the department. Sec. 354. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of corrections shall report not later than 72 hours after occurrence, any critical incident occurring at a correctional facility. The report must identify the facility at which the incident occurred. (2) As used in this section, "critical incident" includes a prisoner assault on staff that results in a serious physical injury to staff, an escape or attempted escape, a prisoner disturbance that causes facility operation concerns, a drug overdose or suspected overdose that results in inpatient hospitalization, and an unexpected death of a prisoner. DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION Sec. 376. (1) The department of education may use the appropriation in part 1 for per diem payments to state board members for meetings at which a quorum is present or for performing official business authorized by the state board. Per diem payments are set at the following rates: (a) State board of education - president - $110.00 per day. (b) State board of education - member other than president - $100.00 per day. (2) The department shall not pay a state board of education member a per diem for more than 30 days per year. Sec. 377. Employees at the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind who work on a school-year basis are considered annual employees for purposes of service credits, retirement, and insurance benefits. Sec. 378. For each student enrolled at the Michigan Schools for the Deaf and Blind, the department shall assess the intermediate school district of residence 100% of the cost of operating the student's instructional program, excluding room and board related costs and the cost of weekend transportation between the school and the student's home. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENT, GREAT LAKES, AND ENERGY Sec. 401. (1) The department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy may expend amounts remaining from the current and prior fiscal year appropriations to meet funding needs of the environmental cleanup and redevelopment program, environmental cleanup support, contaminated site cleanup, contaminated site cleanup contingency reserve, Premcor remediation activities, PFAS remediation grant program, the renew Michigan program, the refined petroleum product cleanup program, brownfield grants and loans, waterfront grants, and the environmental bond site reclamation program. (2) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from appropriations from the clean Michigan initiative fund - response activities contained in 2011 PA 63, 2013 PA 59, 2014 PA 252, 2015 PA 84, 2016 PA 268, and 2017 PA 107, are appropriated for expenditure. (3) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from appropriations from the refined petroleum fund activities contained in 2013 PA 59, 2014 PA 252, 2015 PA 84, 2016 PA 268, 2017 PA 107, 2018 PA 207, 2019 PA 57, 2020 PA 166, 2021 PA 87, and 2022 PA 166 are appropriated for expenditure. (4) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from appropriations from the strategic water quality initiatives fund contained in 2011 PA 50, 2011 PA 63, 2012 PA 200, 2013 PA 59, 2014 PA 252, 2015 PA 84, 2016 PA 268, 2017 PA 107, and 2018 PA 207, are appropriated for expenditure. (5) For the strategic water quality initiatives fund, funds not yet disbursed are appropriated for expenditure for the same program under sections 5201, 5202, and 5204e of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5201, 324.5202, and 324.5204e. (6) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from appropriations from the renew Michigan fund contained in 2018 PA 207, 2019 PA 57, 2020 PA 166, 2021 PA 87, and 2022 PA 166 are appropriated for expenditure. (7) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from appropriations from the general fund contained in 2021 PA 87 and 2022 PA 166 are appropriated for expenditure. (8) Unexpended and unencumbered amounts remaining from appropriations from the contaminated site cleanup contingency fund contained in 2021 PA 87 and 2022 PA 166, are appropriated for expenditure. Sec. 402. (1) On approval by the state budget director, the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy may expend from the general fund of the state an amount to meet the cash-flow requirements of projects funded under any of the following that are financed from bond proceeds and for which bonds have been authorized but not yet issued: (a) Part 52 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.5201 to 324.5206. (b) Part 193 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.19301 to 324.19306. (c) Part 196 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.19601 to 324.19616. (2) On the sale of bonds for projects described in subsection (1), the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy shall credit the general fund of this state an amount equal to that expended from the general fund. Sec. 403. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy may receive and expend funding from the subaccounts of the cleanup and redevelopment fund as described under section 20108 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.20108, including the environmental response fund or the natural resource damages fund, to provide funding for actions by the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy that are authorized by a court of competent jurisdiction and set forth in a final court order or judgment in an action to which the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy is a party. Sec. 404. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy may receive and expend funding from the Volkswagen Environmental Mitigation Trust Agreement to provide support activities outlined in this state's mitigation plan. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Sec. 426. (1) The appropriations in part 1 assume a total federal child support incentive payment of $26,500,000.00. (2) From the federal money received for child support incentive payments, $12,000,000.00 must be retained by this state and expended for child support program expenses. (3) From the federal money received for child support incentive payments, $14,500,000.00 must be paid to counties based on each county's performance level for each of the performance measures under 45 CFR 305.2. (4) If the child support incentive payment to this state from the federal government is greater than $26,500,000.00, then 100% of the amount in excess must be retained by this state and is appropriated until the total retained by this state reaches $15,397,400.00. (5) If the child support incentive payment to this state from the federal government is greater than the amount needed to satisfy subsections (1), (2), (3), and (4), the additional funds are subject to appropriation by the legislature. (6) If the child support incentive payment to this state from the federal government is less than $26,500,000.00, then the state share and the county share must each be reduced by 50% of the shortfall. Sec. 427. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of health and human services shall allocate funds to the emergency shelter program to support efforts of shelter providers to move homeless individuals and households into permanent housing as quickly as possible. The funds must be equal to or exceed the amount that a provider would receive if the provider is paid a $19.00 per diem rate. Expected outcomes are increased shelter discharges to stable housing destinations, decreased recidivism rates for shelter clients, and a reduction in the average length of stay in emergency shelters. Sec. 428. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of health and human services shall reimburse Indian tribal governments for 50% of the foster care expenditures for children who are under the jurisdiction of Indian tribal courts and are not otherwise eligible for federal foster care cost sharing. However, the department of health and human services may reimburse up to 100% of the foster care expenditures for an Indian tribal government that enters into a state-tribal title IV-E agreement allowed under this state's title IV-E state plan. Sec. 429. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of health and human services shall implement a rate structure that pays for cases based on the average length of time it takes to reach adoption finalization by case characteristics for licensed child placing agencies contracted with the department of health and human services that provide adoption services for youth in foster care. (2) For cases accepted before the implementation of the new rate structure described in subsection (1), the department of health and human services shall maintain the increase of contracted rates paid to private child placing agencies, including the $23.00 per diem for all foster youth from the date of the case acceptance to the date of adoption petition acceptance or 150 days, whichever occurs sooner, for licensed child placing agencies contracted with the department of health and human services to provide adoption services for foster youth. The per diem rate must be separate from the outcome-based reimbursement system and must not be deducted from the total reimbursement an agency receives for the applicable placement or finalization rate of an adoption. Sec. 430. (1) From funds appropriated in part 1, the administrative or indirect cost payment equal to 10% of a county's total monthly gross expenditures must be distributed to the county on a monthly basis, and a county is not required to submit documentation to the department of health and human services for any of the expenditures that are covered under the 10% payment as described in section 117a(4)(b)(ii) and (iv) of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.117a. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of health and human services shall allocate $3,500,000.00 to counties and tribal governments that receive reimbursements in part 1 from the child care fund. (3) The amount described in subsection (2) must be distributed to each county or tribal government in the same proportion as indirect cost allotments are provided to counties in the same manner described in section 117a of the social welfare act, 1939 PA 280, MCL 400.117a. Sec. 431. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of health and human services shall pay an administrative rate of not less than $60.20 to providers of general foster care, independent living, and trial reunification services. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of health and human services shall pay providers of independent living plus services per diem statewide rates for staff-supported housing and host-home housing that are based on proposals submitted in response to a solicitation for pricing. The independent living plus program provides staff-supported housing and services for foster youth 16 years of age to 19 years of age who, because of their individual needs and assessments, are not initially appropriate for general independent living foster care. Sec. 432. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of health and human services shall pay a minimum rate that is not less than the approved age-appropriate payment rates for youth placed in family foster care. Sec. 433. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of health and human services shall pay 100% of the administrative rate for all new cases referred to providers of foster care services. Sec. 434. (1) Each PIHP shall provide, from the PIHP's internal resources, local funds to be used as a part of the state match required under the Medicaid program to increase capitation rates for PIHPs. The local funds must not include either of the following: (a) State funds received by a CMHSP for services provided to non-Medicaid recipients. (b) The state matching portion of the Medicaid capitation payments made to a PIHP. (2) As used in this act: (a) "CMHSP" means a community mental health services program as that term is defined in section 100a of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1100a. (b) "PIHP" means an entity designated by the department of health and human services as a regional entity or a specialty prepaid inpatient health plan for Medicaid mental health services, services to individuals with developmental disabilities, and substance use disorder services. Regional entities are described in section 204b of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1204b. Specialty prepaid inpatient health plans are described in section 232b of the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1232b. Sec. 435. A county required under the mental health code, 1974 PA 258, MCL 330.1001 to 330.2106, to provide matching funds to a CMHSP for mental health services rendered to residents in the county's jurisdiction shall pay the matching funds in equal installments on not less than a quarterly basis throughout the fiscal year, with the first payment being made by October 1 of the current fiscal year. Sec. 436. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of health and human services shall make monthly payments of $300.36 to a parent or legal guardian of a child approved for the family support subsidy by a CMHSP. Sec. 437. If a county that participates in a district health department or has an associated arrangement with another local health department takes action to stop participating in that arrangement after October 1 of the current fiscal year, the department of health and human services may assess a penalty from the local health department's operational accounts in an amount equal to no more than 6.25% of the local health department's essential local public health services funding. The department of health and human services shall assess a penalty only if a county requests the dissolution of the county's local health department. Sec. 438. (1) For care provided to Medicaid recipients with other third-party sources of payment, Medicaid reimbursement must not exceed, in combination with such other resources, including Medicare, those amounts established for Medicaid-only patients. The Medicaid payment rate must be accepted as payment in full. Other than an approved Medicaid copayment, no portion of a provider's charge shall be billed to the recipient or any person acting on behalf of the recipient. This section does not affect the level of payment from a third-party source other than the Medicaid program. The department of health and human services shall require a nonenrolled provider to accept Medicaid payments as payment in full. (2) Notwithstanding subsection (1), if a hospital service is provided to a dual Medicare/Medicaid recipient with only Medicare part B coverage, the Medicaid reimbursement must equal, when combined with a payment for Medicare or other third-party source of payment, the amount established for a Medicaid-only patient, including a capital payment. Sec. 439. (1) If a Medicaid claim is a fee-for-service Medicaid claim, the professional dispensing fee for a drug that is listed as a medication on the Michigan pharmaceutical products list is $20.02 or the pharmacy's submitted dispensing fee, whichever is less. (2) If a Medicaid claim is a fee-for-service Medicaid claim, the professional dispensing fee for a drug that is not listed as a specialty medication on the Michigan pharmaceutical products list is as follows: (a) If the drug is indicated as preferred on the department of health and human services' preferred drug list, $10.80 or the pharmacy's submitted dispensing fee, whichever is less. (b) If the drug is not on the department of health and human services' preferred drug list, $10.64 or the pharmacy's submitted dispensing fee, whichever is less. (c) If the drug is indicated as nonpreferred on the department of health and human services' preferred drug list, $9.00 or the pharmacy's submitted dispensing fee, whichever is less. Sec. 440. (1) The department of health and human services shall require copayments on dental, podiatric, and vision services provided to Medicaid recipients, except as prohibited by federal law or a law of this state. (2) Except as otherwise prohibited by federal law or a law of this state, the department of health and human services shall require Medicaid recipients to pay the following copayments: (a) Two dollars for a physician office visit. (b) Three dollars for a hospital emergency room visit. (c) Fifty dollars for the first day of an inpatient hospital stay. (d) Two dollars for an outpatient hospital visit. (e) One dollar for a generic drug or any drug indicated as preferred on the department of health and human services' preferred drug list and $3.00 for a brand-name drug not indicated as preferred on the department of health and human services' preferred drug list. Sec. 441. In addition to the appropriation in part 1, the department of health and human services is authorized to receive and spend penalty money received as the result of noncompliance with Medicaid certification regulations. Penalty money, characterized as private funds, received by the department of health and human services increases authorizations and allotments in the long-term care accounts. Sec. 442. (1) The department of health and human services is authorized to pursue reimbursement for eligible services provided in Michigan schools from the federal Medicaid program. The department of health and human services and the state budget director are authorized to negotiate and enter into agreements, together with the department of education, with local and intermediate school districts regarding the sharing of federal Medicaid services funds received for these services. The department of health and human services is authorized to receive and disburse funds to participating school districts pursuant to agreements described in this subsection and pursuant to federal law and a law of this state. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of health and human services is authorized to do all of the following: (a) Finance activities within the behavioral and physical health and aging services administration related to eligible services. (b) Reimburse participating school districts pursuant to the fund-sharing ratios negotiated in the state-local agreements authorized in subsection (1). (c) Offset general fund costs associated with the Medicaid program. Sec. 443. The department of health and human services shall obtain proof from all Medicaid recipients that they are United States citizens or otherwise legally residing in this country and that they are residents of this state before approving Medicaid eligibility. Sec. 444. The department of health and human services shall certify annually whether rates paid to Medicaid health plans and specialty PIHPs are actuarially sound in accordance with federal requirements. The department of health and human services shall provide to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on the department budget, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office a copy of the rate certification required under this section and the approval of rates paid to Medicaid health plans and specialty PIHPs for any fiscal year not later than October 1 for Medicaid capitation rate certifications. Following the rate certification, the department of health and human services shall ensure that no new or revised state Medicaid policy bulletin that is promulgated materially impacts the capitation rates that have been certified. Sec. 445. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of health and human services shall maintain Medicaid reimbursement for the administration of injectable and oral vaccines at $23.03. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES Sec. 451. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, funds collected by the department of insurance and financial services in connection with a conservatorship under section 32 of the mortgage brokers, lenders, and servicers licensing act, 1987 PA 173, MCL 445.1682, and funds collected by the department of insurance and financial services from corporations being liquidated under the insurance code of 1956, 1956 PA 218, MCL 500.100 to 500.8302, must be appropriated for all expenses necessary to provide for the required services. Funds are available for expenditure when they are received by the department of treasury. Sec. 452. The department of insurance and financial services may make available to interested entities customized listings of nonconfidential information in its possession. The department of insurance and financial services may establish and collect a reasonable charge to provide this service. The revenue from this service is appropriated when received and must be used to offset expenses to provide the service. JUDICIARY Sec. 476. If funds in the court fee fund are insufficient to pay judges' compensation, the difference between the appropriated amount from that fund for judges' compensation and the actual amount available after the amount appropriated for trial court reimbursement is made is appropriated from the state general fund for judges' compensation. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY Sec. 501. Federal pass-through funds to local institutions and governments that are received in amounts in addition to those included in part 1 and that do not require additional state matching funds are appropriated for the purposes intended. The department of labor and economic opportunity shall report the amount and source of the funds to the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on labor and economic opportunity, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office not later than 10 business days after receiving any additional pass-through funds. Sec. 502. (1) Grants supported with private revenues received by the department of labor and economic opportunity are appropriated on receipt and are available for expenditure by the department for purposes specified within the grant agreement and as permitted under state and federal law. (2) Not later than 10 days after the receipt of a private grant appropriated in subsection (1), the department of labor and economic opportunity shall notify the senate and house chairpersons of the appropriations subcommittees on of labor and economic opportunity, the senate and house fiscal agencies, and the state budget office of the receipt of the grant, including the fund source, purpose, and amount of the grant. Sec. 503. (1) The department of labor and economic opportunity may charge registration fees to attendees of informational, training, or special events that are sponsored by the department of labor and economic opportunity and related to activities that are under the department of labor and economic opportunity's purview. (2) The fees under subsection (1) must reflect the costs for the department of labor and economic opportunity to sponsor the informational, training, or special events. (3) Revenue generated by the registration fees under subsection (1) is appropriated on receipt and available for expenditure to cover the department of labor and economic opportunity's costs of sponsoring informational, training, or special events. Sec. 504. The department of labor and economic opportunity may sell documents at a price not to exceed the cost of production and distribution. Funding received from the sale of these documents must revert to the department of labor and economic opportunity. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, these funds are available for expenditure when they are received by the department of treasury. This subsection applies only to R 418.10101 to R 418.101504 of the Michigan Administrative Code. Sec. 505. In addition to amounts appropriated in part 1, the state land bank authority may expend revenues received under the land bank fast track act, 2003 PA 258, MCL 124.751 to 124.774, for the purposes authorized by the act, including, but not limited to, the acquisition, lease, management, demolition, maintenance, or rehabilitation of real or personal property, payment of debt service for notes or bonds issued by the authority, and other expenses to clear or quiet title property held by the authority. The state land bank authority may establish partnerships with local land bank authorities. Sec. 506. In addition to the appropriation in part 1, Travel Michigan may receive and expend private revenue related to the use of "Pure Michigan" and all other copyrighted slogans and images. This revenue may come from the direct licensing of the name and image or from the royalty payments from various merchandise sales. Revenue collected is appropriated for the marketing of this state as a travel destination. The funds are available for expenditure when they are received by the department of treasury. Sec. 507. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, the funds collected by state historic preservation programs for document reproduction and services and application fees are appropriated for all expenses necessary to provide the required services. These funds are available for expenditure when they are received. Sec. 508. Tax capture revenues collected in accordance with written agreements under the good jobs for Michigan program and transferred from the general fund for deposit into the good jobs for Michigan fund, and for both calculated payments from the good jobs for Michigan fund to authorized businesses and distributions to the fund for administrative expenses, are appropriated under the provisions of chapter 8D of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090g to 125.2090j. Sec. 509. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, any unencumbered and unrestricted funds allocated under the federal workforce innovation and opportunity act, 29 USC 3101 to 3361, or trade adjustment assistance funds available from previous fiscal years are appropriated for the purposes originally intended. LEGISLATURE Sec. 526. The senate may charge rent and assess charges for utility costs. The amounts received for rent charges and utility assessments are appropriated to the senate for the renovation, operation, and maintenance of the Binsfeld Office Building. Sec. 527. (1) The appropriation in part 1 to general operations includes funds to operate the legislative parking facilities in the capitol area. The Michigan state capitol commission shall establish rules regarding the operation of the legislative parking facilities. (2) The Michigan state capitol commission may collect a fee from state employees and the general public using certain legislative parking facilities. The revenues received from the parking fees are appropriated on receipt and must be allocated by the Michigan state capitol commission. (3) As used in this section, "Michigan state capitol commission" means the Michigan state capitol commission established in section 5 of the Michigan state capitol historic site act, 2013 PA 240, MCL 4.1945. Sec. 528. In accordance with section 53 of article IV of the state constitution of 1963, the auditor general shall conduct audits of the executive, judicial, and legislative branches. Sec. 529. A branch, department, office, board, commission, agency, authority, or institution of this state shall not deny the auditor general access to examine its confidential information. The auditor general is subject to the same duty of confidentiality imposed by law on the entity providing the confidential information. DEPARTMENT OF LICENSING AND REGULATORY AFFAIRS Sec. 556. The department of licensing and regulatory affairs may provide to interested entities otherwise unavailable customized listings of nonconfidential information, such as the names and addresses of licensees, in the department of licensing and regulatory affairs' possession. The department of licensing and regulatory affairs may establish and collect a reasonable fee to provide this service. Revenue generated from this service is appropriated on receipt and must be used to offset the expenses of the service. Sec. 557. (1) The department of licensing and regulatory affairs shall sell documents at a price not to exceed the cost of production and distribution. Funding received from the sale of these documents reverts to the department of licensing and regulatory affairs. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, funds received by the department of licensing and regulatory affairs under this subsection may be expended by the department on receipt. This subsection applies for only the following: (a) Corporation and securities division documents, reports, and papers required or permitted by law in accordance with section 1060(6) of the business corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL 450.2060. (b) The Michigan liquor control code of 1998, 1998 PA 58, MCL 436.1101 to 436.2303. (c) The mobile home commission act, 1987 PA 96, MCL 125.2301 to 125.2350; the business corporation act, 1972 PA 284, MCL 450.1101 to 450.2098; the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2101 to 450.3192; and the uniform securities act (2002), 2008 PA 551, MCL 451.2101 to 451.2703. (d) Construction code manuals. (e) Copies of transcripts from administrative law hearings. (2) In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, funds appropriated for the department of licensing and regulatory affairs under sections 57, 58, and 59 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.257, 24.258, and 24.259, and section 203 of the legislative council act, 1986 PA 268, MCL 4.1203, are appropriated for all expenses necessary to provide for the cost of publication and distribution. Sec. 558. The department of licensing and regulatory affairs shall not expend the funds appropriated under this part and part 1 for the bureau of fire services unless, in accordance with section 2c of the fire prevention code, 1941 PA 207, MCL 29.2c, inspection and plan review fees are charged according to the following fee schedule: Operation and maintenance inspection fee Facility type Facility size Fee Hospitals Any $8.00 per bed Plan review and construction inspection fees for hospitals and schools Project cost range Fee $101,000.00 or less minimum fee of $155.00 $101,001.00 to $1,500,000.00 $1.60 per $1,000.00 $1,500,001.00 to $10,000,000.00 $1.30 per $1,000.00 $10,000,001.00 or more $1.10 per $1,000.00 or a maximum fee of $60,000.00. Sec. 559. (1) The department of licensing and regulatory affairs may charge registration fees to attendees of informational, training, or special events that are sponsored by the department of licensing and regulatory affairs and related to activities under the department of licensing and regulatory affairs' purview. (2) The registration fees must reflect the costs for the department of licensing and regulatory affairs to sponsor the informational, training, or special events. (3) Revenue generated by the registration fees is appropriated on receipt and may be expended by the department of licensing and regulatory affairs to cover the department of licensing and regulatory affairs' costs of sponsoring informational, training, or special events. Sec. 560. If Byrne formula grant funding is awarded to the Michigan indigent defense commission created under section 5 of the Michigan indigent defense commission act, 2013 PA 93, MCL 780.985, the Michigan indigent defense commission may receive and expend Byrne formula grant funds as an interdepartmental grant from the department of state police. The Michigan indigent defense commission may receive and expend federal grant funds from the United States Department of Justice. DEPARTMENT OF LIFELONG EDUCATION, ADVANCEMENT, AND POTENTIAL Sec. 576. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the provider reimbursement rates for child care centers, group home providers, registered family homes, and license exempt providers are maintained at the provider reimbursement rates established in the child development and care handbook for fiscal year 2024-2025. Sec. 577. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the income entrance eligibility threshold for the child development and care program is set to not more than 200% of the federal poverty guidelines. Sec. 578. From the funds appropriated in part 1, for eligible children in the child development and care program, the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential shall implement payments to providers based on enrollment rather than based on attendance. This must be done in a manner determined by the department. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES Sec. 601. The department of natural resources may contract with or provide grants to local units of government, institutions of higher education, or nonprofit organizations to support activities. As used in this section, contracts and grants include, but are not limited to, contracts and grants for research, wildlife and fisheries management, forest management, invasive species monitoring and control, and natural resource-related programs. Sec. 602. The department of natural resources may accept monetary and nonmonetary gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants from any private or public source to support, in whole or in part, a departmental function or program. The department of natural resources shall expend or use such gifts, bequests, donations, contributions, or grants for the purposes designated by the private or public source, if the purpose is specified. Sec. 603. The department of natural resources may charge land acquisition projects appropriated for the current fiscal year and for prior fiscal years, a standard percentage fee to recover actual costs, and may use the revenue derived to fund land acquisition service charges. Sec. 604. The department of natural resources may charge both application fees and transaction fees related to the exchange or sale of state-owned land or rights in land authorized by part 21 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.2101 to 324.2165. To the extent consistent with part 21, fees shall be set by the director at a rate that allows the department of resources to recover its costs for providing these services. Sec. 605. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, the department of natural resources may receive and expend funding from state restricted sources to pay vendor costs associated with administering sales of carbon offset credits. Sec. 606. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, the department of natural resources may receive and expend funding from federal sources to provide response to wildfires and hazard incidents as required by a compact with the federal government. If additional expenditure authorization is required, the department of natural resources shall notify the state budget office. DEPARTMENT OF STATE Sec. 626. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of state may restrict funds from miscellaneous revenue to cover cash shortages created from normal branch office operations. The restricted amount must not exceed $50,000.00 of the total funds available in miscellaneous revenue. Sec. 627. Collector plate and fund-raising registration plate revenues collected by the department of state are appropriated and allotted for distribution to the recipient university or public or private agency overseeing a state-sponsored goal when received. Sec. 628. (1) The department of state, in collaboration with the Gift of Life Michigan or its successor federally designated organ procurement organization, may develop and administer a public information campaign concerning the Michigan organ donor program. (2) The department of state may solicit funds from any private or public source to underwrite, in whole or in part, the public information campaign authorized by this section. The department of state may accept gifts, donations, contributions, and grants of money and other property from private and public sources for this purpose. A private or public funding source underwriting the public information campaign, in whole or in substantial part, must receive sponsorship credit for its financial backing. (3) Funding allocated for the organ donor program must be used to produce a pamphlet regarding organ donations and to distribute the pamphlet with driver licenses and personal identification cards. The pamphlet must do both of the following: (a) Explain the organ donor program and encourage people to become donors by marking a checkoff on driver license and personal identification card applications. (b) Include a return reply form addressed to the gift of life organization. (4) Funding allocated for the organ donor program must be used to pay for return postage costs of the return reply form described in subsection (3)(b). (5) In addition to the appropriation in part 1, the department of state may receive and expend funds from the organ and tissue donation education fund for administrative expenses. Sec. 629. (1) Except as otherwise provided under subsection (2), before closing a branch office, consolidating a branch office, or relocating a branch office, the department of state shall submit a report to the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on general government, the legislators who represent affected areas, the senate and house fiscal agencies, the senate and house policy offices, and the state budget office. The report must include all of the following: (a) All analyses completed regarding criteria for changes in the location of branch offices, including, but not limited to, all of the following: (i) Branch transactions. (ii) Revenue. (iii) The impact on citizens of the affected area, including information regarding additional distance to branch office locations resulting from the changes. (b) Detailed estimates of costs and savings that will result from the overall changes made to the branch office structure. (c) Detailed estimates of costs for new leased facilities and expansions of current leased space. (2) If the consolidation of a branch office is with another branch office that is located within the same local unit of government or the relocation of a branch office is to another location that is located within the same local unit of government, the department of state is not required to submit a report under subsection (1). (3) As used in this section, "local unit of government" means a city, village, township, or county. Sec. 630. (1) Any service assessment collected by the department of state from the user of a credit or debit card under section 3 of 1995 PA 144, MCL 11.23, may be used by the department of state for necessary expenses related to that service and may be remitted to a credit or debit card company, bank, or other financial institution. (2) The service assessment imposed by the department of state for credit and debit card services may be based on a percentage of each individual credit or debit card transaction or a flat rate per transaction, or both, scaled to the amount of the transaction. The department of state shall not charge any amount for a service assessment that exceeds costs billable to the department of state for the service assessment. (3) As used in this section, "service assessment" means costs associated with service fees imposed by credit and debit card companies and processing fees imposed by banks and other financial institutions. Sec. 631. Funds allocated for election regulation must be spent in accordance with the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.1 to 168.992, and the instructions, orders, and guidance of the secretary of state regarding the proper method for the conduct and administration of elections. DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE Sec. 651. (1) The state director of emergency management may expend funds appropriated in part 1 to call on any agency or department of this state or any resource of this state to protect life or property or to provide for the health or safety of the population in any area of this state in which the governor proclaims a state of emergency or state of disaster under the emergency management act, 1976 PA 390, MCL 30.401 to 30.421. The state director of emergency management may expend the amounts the director considers necessary to accomplish these purposes. The director shall submit to the state budget office, as soon as possible, a complete report of all actions taken under the authority of this section. The report must contain, as a separate item, a statement of all federal funding expended that is not reimbursable. The state budget office shall review the expenditures and submit recommendations to the legislature regarding any possible need for supplemental appropriations. (2) In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, the department of state police may receive and expend funding from local, private, federal, or state sources for the purpose of providing emergency management training to local or private interests and for the purpose of supporting emergency preparedness, response, recovery, and mitigation activity. If additional expenditure authorization in statewide integrated governmental management applications is approved by the state budget office under this section, the department of state police and the state budget office shall notify the senate and house appropriations subcommittees on state police and the senate and house fiscal agencies not later than 10 days after the approval. The notification must include the amount and source of the additional authorization, the date of its approval, and the projected use of the funds to be expended under the authorization. The total amount of federal revenues that may be received and expended under this section must not exceed $9,600,000.00. DEPARTMENT OF TECHNOLOGY, MANAGEMENT, AND BUDGET Sec. 676. Any proceeds that exceed necessary costs incurred in conducting transfers, auctions, direct sales, or scrapping of state surplus property under section 267 of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1267, are appropriated to the department of technology, management, and budget to offset any costs incurred in the acquisition and distribution of surplus property. The department of technology, management, and budget shall provide consolidated internet auction services through this state's contractors for all local units of government. Sec. 677. (1) The department of technology, management, and budget may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in part 1 for maintenance and operation services provided specifically to other principal executive departments or state agencies, the legislative branch, the judicial branch, or private tenants, or provided in connection with facilities transferred to the operational jurisdiction of the department of technology, management, and budget. (2) The department of technology, management, and budget may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in part 1 for real estate, architectural, design, engineering, and project oversight services provided specifically to other principal executive departments or state agencies, the legislative branch, the judicial branch, universities, community colleges, or private tenants. (3) The department of technology, management, and budget may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in part 1 for mail pickup and delivery services provided specifically to other principal executive departments and state agencies, the legislative branch, or the judicial branch. (4) The department of technology, management, and budget may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in part 1 for purchasing services provided specifically to other principal executive departments and state agencies, the legislative branch, or the judicial branch. Sec. 678. To the extent a specific appropriation is required for a detailed source of financing included in part 1 for the department of technology, management, and budget appropriation financed from special revenue and internal service and pension trust funds, or statewide integrated governmental management applications user charges, the specific amounts are appropriated within the special revenue internal service and pension trust funds. Sec. 679. Statewide integrated governmental management applications must be funded by proportionate charges assessed against the respective state funds benefiting from the statewide integrated governmental management applications project in amounts determined by department of technology, management, and budget. Sec. 680. (1) A deposit against the interdepartmental grant appropriated in part 1 must be collected, in part, from state agencies, the legislative branch, and the judicial branch based on estimated costs associated with maintenance and operation of buildings managed by department of technology, management, and budget. (2) An allocation for building occupancy and parking charges may be increased to return excess revenue collected to state agencies. Sec. 681. (1) Funds allocated for motor vehicle fleet are for administration and the acquisition, lease, operation, maintenance, repair, replacement, and disposal of state motor vehicles. (2) Funds described in subsection (1) must be funded by revenue from rates charged to principal executive departments and agencies for utilizing vehicle travel services provided by the department of technology, management, and budget. (3) The department of technology, management, and budget may charge state agencies for fuel cost increases that exceed 10% of the budgeted price per gallon of motor vehicle fuels. The department of technology, management, and budget shall notify state agencies, in writing or by email, before implementing additional charges for fuel cost increases. Any revenue received from these charges is appropriated on receipt. (4) The state budget director, on notification to the senate and house appropriations committees, may adjust spending authorization and interdepartmental grant funding to ensure the appropriation for motor vehicle fleet equals the expenditures for motor vehicle fleet in the budgets for all executive branch agencies. Sec. 682. Funds appropriated in part 1 must not be used to support any staff effort, projects, consultant expenses, or any other activity related to the development, financing, construction, operation, or implementation of the Gordie Howe International Crossing or any successor project unless the approval of the project is enacted into law. Sec. 683. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, funds collected by the department for supplying census-related information and technical services, publications, statistical studies, population projections and estimates, and other demographic products are appropriated for all expenses necessary to provide the required services. Sec. 684. The department of technology, management, and budget may receive and expend funds from the Vietnam veterans memorial monument fund in accordance with the Michigan Vietnam veterans memorial act, 1988 PA 234, MCL 35.1051 to 35.1057. The funds are appropriated and allocated when received by the department and may be expended on receipt. Sec. 685. The Michigan veterans' memorial park commission may receive and expend funds from any source, public or private, including, but not limited to, gifts, grants, donations of money, and government appropriations, for the purposes described in Executive Order No. 2001-10. The funds are appropriated and allocated when received by the Michigan veterans' memorial park commission and may be expended on receipt. Sec. 686. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, the department of technology, management, and budget may receive and expend funding from the Michigan law enforcement officers memorial monument fund in accordance with the Michigan law enforcement officers memorial act, 2004 PA 177, MCL 28.781 to 28.786. Sec. 687. The department of technology, management, and budget may enter into agreements to provide spatial information and technical services to other principal executive departments, state agencies, local units of government, and other organizations. The department of technology, management, and budget may receive and expend funds in addition to those authorized in part 1 for providing information and technical services, publications, maps, and other products. The department of technology, management, and budget may expend amounts received for salaries, supplies, and equipment necessary to provide informational products and technical services. Sec. 688. (1) Funds allocated for the Michigan public safety communications system shall be expended on approval of an expenditure plan by the state budget director. (2) The department of technology, management, and budget shall assess all subscribers of the Michigan public safety communications system reasonable access and maintenance fees and deposit the fees in the Michigan public safety communications systems fees fund. (3) All funding received by the department under this section must be expended for support and maintenance of the Michigan public safety communications system. Sec. 689. (1) Any revenue collected from licenses issued under the antenna site management project must be deposited in the antenna site management revolving fund created for this purpose in the department of technology, management, and budget. The department of technology, management, and budget may receive and expend money from the fund for costs associated with the antenna site management project, including the cost of a third-party site manager. (2) An antenna must not be placed on any site under this section without complying with the respective local zoning codes and local unit of government processes. Sec. 690. If the department of technology, management, and budget provides information technology services to a department or agency directly, the department of technology, management, and budget shall submit a monthly invoice to the department or agency for the information technology services provided. If the department of technology, management, and budget provides information technology services to a department or agency through a contracted vendor, the department of technology, management, and budget shall submit an invoice to the department or agency not later than 45 days after the department of technology, management, and budget receives approval to pay the vendor invoice. Sec. 691. The state budget director, on notification to the senate and house appropriations committees, the senate and house subcommittees on general government, the senate and house fiscal agencies, and the senate and house policy offices, may adjust spending authorization and user fees in the department of technology, management, and budget to ensure that the appropriation for information technology in the department of technology, management, and budget equals the appropriations for information technology in the budgets for all executive branch agencies. Sec. 692. (1) Funds appropriated in part 1 for state building authority rent may, in addition to this purpose, be expended for the payment of required premiums for insurance on facilities owned by the state building authority or payment of costs that may be incurred as the result of any deductible provisions in the applicable insurance policies. (2) If the amount appropriated in part 1 for state building authority rent is not sufficient to pay the rent obligations and insurance premiums and deductibles identified in subsection (1) for state building authority projects, there is appropriated from the general fund of this state the amount necessary to pay the obligations. Sec. 693. (1) Funds allocated for statewide appropriations must be funded by assessments against longevity and insurance appropriations throughout state government in a manner prescribed by the department of technology, management, and budget. Funds must be used as specified in joint labor/management agreements, or through the coordinated compensation hearings process. (2) In addition to funds allocated for statewide appropriations, the department of technology, management, and budget may receive and expend funds in the additional amounts specified in joint labor/management agreements, or through the coordinated compensation hearings process, in the same manner and subject to the same conditions as prescribed in subsection (1). Sec. 694. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of technology, management, and budget may receive and expend funds from other principal executive departments and state agencies to implement administrative leave bank transfer provisions specified in joint labor/management agreements. Funds may also be transferred to other principal executive departments and state agencies under the joint labor/management agreement and any amounts transferred under the joint labor/management agreement are authorized for receipt and expenditure by the receiving principal executive department or state agency. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY Sec. 701. (1) Amounts needed to pay for interest, fees, principal, mandatory and optional redemptions, arbitrage rebates as required by federal law, and costs associated with the payment, registration, trustee services, credit enhancements, and issuing costs in excess of the amount appropriated to the department of treasury in part 1 for debt service on notes and bonds that are issued by this state under sections 14, 15, or 16 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, as implemented by 1967 PA 266, MCL 17.451 to 17.455, are appropriated. (2) In addition to the amount appropriated to the department of treasury for debt service in part 1, there is appropriated an amount for fiscal year cash-flow borrowing costs to pay for interest on interfund borrowing authorized under 1967 PA 55, MCL 12.51 to 12.53. (3) In addition to the amount appropriated to the department of treasury for debt service in part 1, all repayments received by this state on loans made from the school bond loan fund that the state treasurer determines are not required to be deposited in the school loan revolving fund under section 4 of 1961 PA 112, MCL 388.984, are appropriated to the department of treasury for the payment of debt service, including, but not limited to, optional and mandatory redemptions, on bonds, notes, or commercial paper issued by this state under 1961 PA 112, MCL 388.981 to 388.985. Sec. 702. (1) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may contract with law firms or private collection agencies to collect taxes and other accounts due this state or due a city for which the department of treasury has entered into an agreement to provide tax administration services. In addition to amounts appropriated in part 1, there are appropriated amounts necessary to fund the cost of these collections, including infrastructure costs. The additional amounts appropriated under this subsection must not exceed 25% of the collections or 2.5% plus operating costs, as applicable. Each contract must prescribe the applicable amount. The amounts allocated to fund collection costs and fees under this subsection are appropriated from the fund or account to which the corresponding taxes and other accounts being collected are recorded or dedicated. However, if the taxes and other accounts collected are dedicated for a specific purpose under the state constitution of 1963, the amounts appropriated under this subsection are appropriated from the general purpose account of the general fund. (2) From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may contract with law firms or private collections agencies to collect defaulted student loans and other accounts due the Michigan guaranty agency. In addition to amounts appropriated in part 1, there are appropriated amounts necessary to fund collection costs and fees not to exceed 24.34% of the collection or a lesser amount as prescribed by the contract. The amounts allocated under this subsection are appropriated from the fund or account to which the revenues being collected are recorded or dedicated. Sec. 703. (1) The bureau of investments may charge an investment service fee against applicable retirement funds. Revenue from the investment service fees charged under this subsection may be expended for necessary salaries, wages, contractual services, supplies, materials, equipment, travel, worker's compensation insurance premiums, and grants to the civil service commission retirement fund and the state employees' retirement fund. (2) In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, there is appropriated from retirement funds an amount sufficient to pay for the services of money managers, investment advisors, investment consultants, custodians, or other outside professionals that the state treasurer considers necessary to prudently manage the retirement funds' investment portfolios. Sec. 704. (1) There is appropriated an amount sufficient to recognize and pay expenditures for financial services provided by financial institutions or equivalent vendors that perform these financial services, including the department of treasury, as provided under section 1 of 1861 PA 111, MCL 21.181. (2) The appropriation under subsection (1) must be funded by restricting revenues from common cash interest earnings and investment earnings in an amount sufficient to cover these expenditures. If the amounts of common cash interest earnings are insufficient to cover these expenditures, miscellaneous revenues must be used to fund the remaining balance of these expenditures. Sec. 705. The municipal finance fee fund is created in the state treasury as a revolving fund and shall be administered by the department of treasury. The department of treasury shall deposit the fees that the department of treasury collects under the revised municipal finance act, 2001 PA 34, MCL 141.2101 to 141.2821, into the municipal finance fee fund. Sec. 706. (1) The department of treasury shall charge for audits as allowed under state or federal law or under a contract between the department of treasury and a local unit of government, other principal executive department, or state agency. However, the department of treasury shall not charge more than the actual cost for performing the audit. (2) The audit charges fund is created in the state treasury as a revolving fund and shall be administered by the department of treasury. The department of treasury shall deposit the contractual charges collected under subsection (1) into the audit charges fund. Sec. 707. (1) The department of treasury shall create and operate a property assessor certification and training program. The purpose of the program is to offer courses in assessment administration. (2) The assessor certification and training fund is created in the state treasury as a revolving fund and shall be administered by the department of treasury. The department of treasury shall use the money in the assessor certification and training fund to create and operate the property assessor certification and training program described in subsection (1). (3) Each participant in the program shall pay the department of treasury an examination fee not to exceed $50.00 per examination and a certification fee not to exceed $175.00. In addition, each participant shall pay a fee to cover expenses incurred in offering the program to certified assessing personnel and other individuals interested in an assessment career opportunity. The department of treasury shall deposit the fees collected under this subsection into the property assessor certification and training program fund. Sec. 708. Revenue from the airport parking tax act, 1987 PA 248, MCL 207.371 to 207.383, is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 7a of the airport parking tax act, 1987 PA 248, MCL 207.377a. Sec. 709. The disbursement by the department of treasury from the bottle deposit fund to dealers as required by section 3c(3) of 1976 IL 1, MCL 445.573c, is appropriated. Sec. 710. (1) There is appropriated an amount sufficient to recognize and pay refundable tax credits, tax refunds, and interest as provided by law. (2) The appropriation under subsection (1) must be funded by restricting tax revenue in an amount sufficient to cover these expenditures. Sec. 711. A plaintiff in a garnishment action involving this state shall pay the state treasurer 1 of the following: (a) A fee of $6.00 at the time a writ of garnishment of periodic payments is served on the state treasurer, as provided in section 4012 of the revised judicature act of 1961, 1961 PA 236, MCL 600.4012. (b) A fee of $6.00 at the time any other writ of garnishment is served on the state treasurer. However, the fee must be reduced to $5.00 for each writ of garnishment for individual income tax refunds or credits that is filed electronically. Sec. 712. From funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may contract with private auditing firms to audit for and collect unclaimed property due this state in accordance with the uniform unclaimed property act, 1995 PA 29, MCL 567.221 to 567.265. In addition to amounts appropriated in part 1 to the department of treasury, there are appropriated amounts necessary to fund auditing and collection costs and fees not to exceed 12% of the collections or a lesser amount as prescribed by the applicable contract. The appropriation to fund collection costs and fees for the auditing and collection of unclaimed property due this state is from the fund or account to which the revenues being collected are recorded or dedicated. Sec. 713. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may receive and expend principal residence audit fund revenue for administration of principal residence audits under the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.1 to 211.155. Sec. 714. The department of treasury may provide receipt, check and cash processing, data, collection, investment, fiscal agent, levy and check cost assessment, writ of garnishment, and other user services on a contractual basis for other principal executive departments and state agencies. Funds for the services provided are appropriated and must be expended for salaries, wages, fees, supplies, and equipment necessary to provide the services. Sec. 715. The department of treasury shall provide accounts receivable collections services to other principal executive departments and state agencies in accordance with 1927 PA 375, MCL 14.131 to 14.134, or to a city with which the department of treasury has contracted to provide tax administration services. The department of treasury shall deduct a fee equal to the cost of collections from all receipts except for unrestricted general fund collections. Fees must be credited to a restricted revenue account and are appropriated to the department of treasury to pay for the cost of collections. If the department of treasury deducts fees under this subsection that total an amount that is greater than the actual cost of the collections, the department of treasury shall periodically repay the surplus to the respective account. The department of treasury shall maintain accounting records in sufficient detail to enable repayment under this subsection. Sec. 716. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, treasury fees must be assessed against all restricted funds that receive common cash earnings or other investment income. This subsection does not apply to federal or state restricted funds that are temporary in nature or otherwise do not qualify to be assessed treasury fees. The fee assessed against each restricted fund must be based on the size of the restricted fund, calculated as the absolute value of the average daily cash balance plus the market value of investments in the immediately preceding fiscal year, and the level of resources necessary to maintain the restricted fund as required by each department. (2) In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may receive and expend investment fees that are related to new restricted funding sources that participate in common cash earnings or other investment income during the current fiscal year. (3) As used in this section, "treasury fees" includes all costs, including administrative overhead, that are related to the investment of a restricted fund. Sec. 717. The board of directors of the Michigan education trust may expend revenue received under the Michigan education trust act, 1986 PA 316, MCL 390.1421 to 390.1442, for necessary salaries, wages, supplies, contractual services, equipment, worker's compensation insurance premiums, and grants to the civil service commission retirement fund and the state employees' retirement fund. Sec. 718. The department of treasury may expend revenues received under the hospital finance authority act, 1969 PA 38, MCL 331.31 to 331.84, the shared credit rating act, 1985 PA 227, MCL 141.1051 to 141.1076, the higher education facilities authority act, 1969 PA 295, MCL 390.921 to 390.934, the Michigan public educational facilities authority, Executive Reorganization Order No. 2002-3, MCL 12.192, the Michigan tobacco settlement finance authority act, 2005 PA 226, MCL 129.261 to 129.279, the land bank fast track act, 2003 PA 258, MCL 124.751 to 124.774, part 505 of the natural resources and environmental protection act, 1994 PA 451, MCL 324.50501 to 324.50522, the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1401 to 125.1499c, and the Michigan finance authority, Executive Reorganization Order No. 2010-2, MCL 12.194, for necessary salaries, wages, supplies, contractual services, equipment, worker's compensation insurance premiums, grants to the civil service commission retirement fund and the state employees' retirement fund, and other expenses as allowed under those acts or executive reorganization orders. Sec. 719. Revenue collected in the state forensic laboratory fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 7 of the forensic laboratory funding act, 1994 PA 35, MCL 12.207. Sec. 720. Revenue collected in the qualified heavy equipment rental personal property exemption reimbursement fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 9 of the qualified heavy equipment rental personal property specific tax act, 2022 PA 35, MCL 211.1129. Sec. 721. Revenue deposited in the local government reimbursement fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 3a of the Michigan trust fund act, 2000 PA 489, MCL 12.253a. Sec. 722. Revenue collected in the convention facility development fund is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with sections 8, 9, and 10 of the state convention facility development act, 1985 PA 106, MCL 207.628, 207.629, and 207.630. Sec. 723. From the funds appropriated in part 1, the department of treasury may contract with private agencies to prevent the disbursement of fraudulent tax refunds. In addition to the amounts appropriated in part 1, there are appropriated amounts necessary to pay the costs of the contracts or to fund operations designed to reduce fraudulent income tax refund payments. The allocation of funding for fraud prevention efforts under this subsection is from the fund or account to which the revenues being collected are recorded or dedicated. Sec. 724. From the funds appropriated in part 1 for city income tax administration program, the department of treasury may expand its individual income tax administration for any additional cities that enter into service-level agreements with the department of treasury for this purpose. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, any additional local funds received as part of the service-level agreements are appropriated to the department of treasury for staffing and administration of the program. Sec. 725. Tax capture revenues collected in accordance with written agreements under the good jobs for Michigan program and transferred from the general fund for deposit into the good jobs for Michigan fund, including tax capture revenues collected for calculated payments from the good jobs for Michigan fund to authorized businesses and distributions to the MSF for administrative expenses, are appropriated in accordance with chapter 8D of the Michigan strategic fund act, 1984 PA 270, MCL 125.2090g to 125.2090j. Sec. 726. Revenue from the tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA 327, MCL 205.421 to 205.436, related to counties with a population of more than 1,700,000 according to the most recent federal decennial census is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with section 12(2)(e) of the tobacco products tax act, 1993 PA 327, MCL 205.432. Sec. 727. Revenue from part 6 of the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27601 to 333.27605, is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with part 6 of the medical marihuana facilities licensing act, 2016 PA 281, MCL 333.27601 to 333.27605. Sec. 728. Revenue from the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967, is appropriated and must be distributed in accordance with the Michigan Regulation and Taxation of Marihuana Act, 2018 IL 1, MCL 333.27951 to 333.27967. Sec. 729. There is appropriated an amount equal to the tax captured revenues due under approved transformational brownfield plans created under the brownfield redevelopment financing act, 1996 PA 381, MCL 125.2651 to 125.2670. Sec. 730. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1, funding in the fostering futures scholarship trust fund, including any funding received as gifts or donations to the fostering futures scholarship trust fund, is appropriated and the department of treasury may issue payments in compliance with the fostering futures scholarship trust fund act, 2008 PA 525, MCL 722.1021 to 722.1031. Sec. 731. In addition to funds appropriated in part 1 to the bureau of state lottery, there is appropriated from state lottery fund revenues the amount necessary for, and directly related to, implementing and operating lottery games under the McCauley-Traxler-Law-Bowman-McNeely lottery act, 1972 PA 239, MCL 432.1 to 432.47, and activities under the Traxler-McCauley-Law-Bowman bingo act, 1972 PA 382, MCL 432.101 to 432.152, including expenditures for contractually mandated payments for vendor commissions, contractually mandated payments for instant tickets intended for resale, the contractual costs of providing and maintaining the online system communications network, and incentive and bonus payments to lottery retailers. Sec. 732. For the bureau of state lottery, there is appropriated 0.083% of 1% of the lottery's immediately preceding fiscal year's gross sales for promotion and advertising. REVENUE STATEMENT Sec. 751. In accordance with section 18 of article V of the state constitution of 1963, fund balances and estimates are presented in the following statement: BUDGET RECOMMENDATIONS BY OPERATING FUNDS (Amounts in millions) Fiscal Year 2025-2026 Beginning Balance Estimated Revenue Ending Balance OPERATING FUNDS General fund/general purpose 721.6 14,650.4 11.7 School aid fund 1,002.6 18,891.4 18.6 Federal aid 0.0 28,767.0 0.0 Transportation funds 0.0 8,583.1 0.0 Special revenue funds 2,788.3 8,824.6 2,103.8 Other funds 2,144.7 129.0 2,273.7 TOTALS $6,657.2 $79,845.5 $4,407.8 This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor